Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2607
Practice of optometry; activities not included.

The practice of optometry shall not be construed to:

(1) Include merchants or dealers who sell glasses as merchandise in an established place of business or who sell contact lenses from a prescription for contact lenses written by an optometrist or a person licensed to practice medicine and surgery and who do not profess to be optometrists or practice optometry;

(2) Restrict, expand, or otherwise alter the scope of practice governed by other statutes; or

(3) Include the performance by an optometric assistant, under the supervision of a licensed optometrist, of duties prescribed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 112, p. 487;

C.S.1929, § 71-1602;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,134;

Laws 1979, LB 9, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 369, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 30;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,134;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 21;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 879.